Louisiana, session 2026, HB584.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The heading of Subpart D-1A of Part II of Chapter 3 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950 and R.S. 46:286.16(A), (B), (C)(introductory paragraph), (1), (3)
through (7), (9), (12), and (15) through (18) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows and R.S. 46:286.16(C)(19) through (21) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 584 ENROLLED
SUBPART D-1A. FOSTER YOUTH'S CHILDREN'S BILL OF RIGHTS
§286.16. Short title; purpose; rights
A. This Subpart shall be cited as the "Foster Youth's Children's Bill of
Rights".
B. The Department of Children and Family Services shall implement,
promote, and support the rights contained in this Section through the policies and
practices of the department as applied to youth ages fourteen children from birth
through age eighteen who are in foster care in this state.
C. Youth ages fourteen Children from birth through age eighteen in foster
care in this state are entitled to the following rights granted to them when it is
determined by the department to be age appropriate and in the best interest of the
youth child:
(1) The right to privacy concerning the youth's child's personal and
confidential information.
* * *
(3) The right to be in a stable and supportive setting that is free from neglect
and emotional, verbal, physical, and sexual abuse or exploitation, and that is the least
restrictive to meet the youth's child's needs.
(4) The right to participate in all case plan meetings, to include supportive
adults of the youth's child's choice to be on the planning team, and to be provided a
copy of the youth's child's case plan every six months or whenever changes are made
to the plan.
(5) The right to have the youth's child's medical and mental health needs met
on a regular and timely basis.
(6) The right to be provided adequate trauma-based counseling and
therapeutic services throughout the youth's child's time in foster care.
(7) The right to be provided the contact information of the youth's child's
caseworker, attorney, and CASA volunteer, and to attend meetings with them on a
regular basis.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 584 ENROLLED
(9) The right to access materials necessary for school and to further the
youth's child's education, including access to a computer or other electronic devices
and to the internet when needed to complete assignments, the right to receive
tutoring services, and the right to access information regarding college admissions.
* * *
(12) The right to remain in the youth's child's school of origin.
* * *
(15) The right to refuse involvement in religious-based activities and the
right to continue the youth's child's cultural, religious, and ethnic traditions and belief
systems.
(16) The right to be free from discrimination of any kind on the basis of the
youth's child's race, color, sex, language, religion, political or other opinion, national,
ethnic, or social origin, property, disability, birth, or other status.
(17) The right to attend and have transportation to services, events, and
activities provided by the Independent Living Skills Program within the youth's
child's region, the right to receive timely notification of upcoming youth child
advocacy and engagement services in the youth's child's region, and the right to be
provided with the entire amount of the monthly allowance as outlined in department
policy.
(18) The right to express and voice the youth's child's needs, concerns, and
desires about foster care.
(19)(a) The right to proper luggage that is considered to be durable and
reusable containers that are in new or like-new condition to move between foster
homes to ensure the child's dignity and safety. Luggage includes backpacks, boxes,
duffel bags, or suitcases. The use of garbage bags is strictly prohibited.
(b) It is the responsibility of the local social services districts to provide
foster children with proper luggage. These districts along with the Department of
Children and Family Services shall host biennial luggage donation drives for luggage
to be distributed to foster children.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 584 ENROLLED
(c) It is the responsibility of the host family to ensure that the luggage
provided by the Department of Children and Family Services remains with each
child.
(20) The right to reliable and safe transportation, including the right to the
age appropriate car restraint system necessary to protect the child as required by R.S.
32:295.
(21) The right to be placed with a suitable family member or other suitable
individual as defined in Children's Code Article 603, when one has been identified
and is capable of safely and appropriately caring for the child.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.